South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S604.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - South Carolina State Board of Funeral Service, relating to South Carolina State Board of Funeral Service, designated as Regulation Document Number 5335, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina State Board of Funeral Service proposes to amend various sections of Chapter 57 of the Code of Regulations, including but not limited to changes necessary to conform to H.4116, which passed during the 2024 legislative session. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on May 24, 2024. ----XX----